src/phonology/sme-phon.twolc
! Two possible strategies for fixing bug 56, the oahpaheaddjiid bug:
! ------------------------------------------------------------------
! 1. lexical strategy: XX instead of X5, and marking in the lexicon
! PrsPtc then do not go to GOAHTI, but to OAHPAHEADDJI, and point to
!  :XX GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
!"Optional Diphthong Simplification in Strong-Grade i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ [ i | e7:e ] XX: ; !XX is just an example of how we might do it...
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goahºtiX5jd:go0điid
! pro: do not need to define G3.
! pro: Opens for lexical variation: moarsi, etc, PrsPtc, Comp must be marked XX or redirected
! con: have to build a set of new lexica, identical to GOAHTI, except for the ref to GODII.
! con: gives a lexical solution to a basically morphophonological problem

! 2. morphophonological strategy, the smj way.
! Define a G3 context, and integrate it into a further rule
!"Optional Diphthong Simplification in Strong-Grade i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ G3 [ i | e7:e ] X5: ; !G3 to be defined...
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goahºtiX5jd:go0điid
! pro: linguistically the right approach, says intuition
! pro: no need for confusing new lexica
! con: defining G3 is a mess, at best
! We have optional dipht. simpl. only in G3-nouns and no cons grad.

! Going for 2:

!"G12 Compulsatory Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ G12 [ i | e7:e ] X5: ;
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goahºtiX5jd:go0điid

!"G3 Facultative Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ G3 [ i | e7:e ] X5: ;
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goahºtiX5jd:go0điid

!Using this one while waiting for the G3 rule to be fixed.
!"Diphthong Simplification in i-Stems before Suffixes Beginning with j:"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns [º:Cns|Cns] Cns:+ [ i | e7:e ] X5: ;
!	where Vx in (e o a) ;          ! goahºtiX5jd:go0điid





"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from i- and a-Stems - obl, norm" ! viehºki > vihkkiin
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ i: | a: ] ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) %^DISIMP: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;				                          ! Western and norm

"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from i- and a-Stems - optional, " ! viehºki > vihkkiin
  Vx:0  => Vow _ Cns:+ [ i: | a: ] ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X5: ;        !           viehkkiin
			where Vx in (e o a) ;				                              ! Eastern, substandard

!!€ viehºki¤X5jn
!!€ vi0hkki00in

"Diphthong Simplification in Certain Forms of u-Stems"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ u: | o7: ] ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: ))
                         [ X3: | (DelCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X6: | Q8: | Y5: | Y6: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in Certain Forms of u-Stems only X2" ! pga konflikt med illative only-regel
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ u: | o7: ] ( ¤: ) ( %>: ) ( ¤: ) ( »: ( »: »: ))
                         [ X2: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;


!"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from u-Verbs - optional, sub"
!  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u:  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X5: ;   ! Eastern, substandard
!			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from u-Verbs - obl, sub"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ u:  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X3: ;  ! Illative onlyl
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in Actor Nouns from u-Verbs - opt, "
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u:  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X W9: ;  ! Illative onlyl
			where Vx in (e o a) ;


"Diphthong Simplification in Diminutives etc. from Trisyllabics with 2nd Syll u/o"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [ u: | o7: ]  ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( NonMPDummy:) Cns:+  ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X2: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification: Conditional in -alla- etc. Derivatives from Trisyllabics"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ [u:o | o7: ] ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( NonMPDummy:) Cns:+ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X1: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in IllSg and Certain Conjug. Forms of a-Stems"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ a:  ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X3: | Q2: | Q3: | Y7: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in Certain Conjugational Forms of i- and u-Stems"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ HighVow:  ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ Q2: | Q3: | Q7: [š:|ž:]| Y7: ] ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification: Optional before Deverbal -alla-, -adda-, -us"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ o7: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( NonMPDummy:) Cns:+ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X1: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;

"Diphthong Simplification in u-Stems before Conditional Marker"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q5: ;
			where Vx in (a e o) ;

"Dipthtong simplification in the attribute forms of AD-adjectives"
  Vx:0 <=> Vow _ Cns:+ Vow ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ Y9: | X9: ] ;
		       where Vx in (a e o) ;

"Diphthong Simplification: Optional before Deverbal st+alla-, st+adda-"
  Vx:0 => Vow _ Cns:+ u:o ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) W5: ;
			where Vx in (e o a) ;


! Vowel Rising
! ------------

"Vowel Rising"
  Vx:Vy <=> Vow: (Cns:*) (%^:) Cns:+ _ ( CntrCns:0 ) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( Dummy:+) j:i ;
			where Vx in (e o)
			      Vy in (i u)
			matched ;

! There is a conflict between e7:i here and e7:á in the Metaphony
! chapter. (e7 is "e with dot below" from the dictionary).
! We need to either restrict the context in the M chapter, or
! in the Vowel Rising part. For now, we try out without the e7:i.
! Needed: Documentation on all the rules in the M chapter.
!			where Vx in (e o e7)
!			      Vy in (i u i )

! The original version had Vx = e,o for Vowel Rising and
! Vx = i,e7,u for General metaphony. Thus, the new feature is
! e7 for Vowel rising.

!!€ boahºti>^DISIMPjmet#
!!€ bo000đi>0imet#

!!€ reŋºko>X2jd#
!!€ reŋ0ku>0id#

!!€ baste>X2j#
!!€ basti>0i#

!!€ asi#bealli>^DISIMPjde#
!!€ asi#be00li>0ide#
! Note. This will fail for now.
! -bealle +sg.ill = -beallái, +pl. ill = -beliide,

!!€ Line>X2j#
!!€ Lini>0i#

! should be Linii, exactly, fine, and is as well.

! Metaphony
! ---------

"General Metaphony"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ Cns:* ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X2: | X6: ] ;
			where Vx in (i e7 u)
			      Vy in (á á o)
			matched ;

!!€ áhččiX2n
!!€ áhččá0n

!"e7 Rising" ! Awaiting discussion.
!  e7:i <=> Vow: Cns:+ _ ( CntrCns:0 ) ( Dummy:+ - W9: - X2: - X6: ) j:i ;
!outcommented due to bug1375



"Metaphony in Derivatives -us, -alla, -adda 1"
  u:o => Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( NonMPDummy2:) Cns:+ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X1: ;
! Here I have a new set, NonMPDummy2, without X7 and X8, to avoid clash with
! the allegro shortening rule. Check for alternative solutions !!!

"Metaphony in Derivatives -us, -alla, -adda 2"
  Vx:á <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) ( NonMPDummy2:) [ Cns: - j: ] (Cns) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X1: ;
			where Vx in (i e7) ;

"Illative Singular Metaphony"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X3: ;
			where Vx in (i a e7)
			      Vy in (á i á )
			matched ;

!!€ stahta>X3j#
!!€ stahti>0i#

!"Illative Singular Metaphony2" !because of STAHTA: stahtai, commented out beacause -ai illative is only for iija-words
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) W9: ;
!            where Vx in (i e7)
!	              Vy in (á á )
!			matched ;

! Commented in again for the sake of Sijte.
!Now Fixed in lexicon

!!€ Sij9te>i#
!!€ Sijte>i#

"Metaphony in Px Contexts of Actor Nouns of i-, a-, and u-Verbs"
Vx:Vy <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X2: | X6: ] ;
			where Vx in (i a u)
			      Vy in (á á o)
			matched ;

"Metaphony in Illative of Actor Nouns of i-, a-, and u-Verbs"
Vx:Vy <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) X3: ;
		       where Vx in (i a )
			     Vy in (á á )
		       matched ;

!"Metaphony in Actor Nouns of i-, a-, and u-Verbs"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _  ( %>: ) ¤: ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ X2: | X3: | X6: ] ;
!			where Vx in (i a ) !u)
!			      Vy in (á á ) !o)
!			matched ;

"Metaphony in MUSH-Derivatives"
  i:á => Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) m: u: š: š: ;

"Potential Marker Metaphony"
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q7: [š:|ž:];
			where Vx in (i u)
			      Vy in (e o)
			matched ;



! Stem vowel alternations
! -----------------------

"Stem Vowel in Contracted Stems"                ! fijdnisY5t:fiidnát
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( CntrCns:) ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Y5: ;
			where Vx in (i a u)
			      Vy in (á á o)
			matched ;
!!€ fijdnisY5t
!!€ fiidná00t


"Stem Vowel before Frequentative d"             ! oažžut:oččodit
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q8: ;                         ! coahkut:coagostit
			where Vx in (u)
			      Vy in (o)
			matched ;
! Note that this rule also triggers other contexts than frequentative -d-
!!€ oažžuQ8dit
!!€ o0ččo0dit

!!€ coahºkuX8stit
!!€ coa00go0stit

!"Stem Vowel before Frequentative l"
!  i:a <=> Cns _ Q9: ;
! This rule is not implemented, there is no Q9 in the sme-lex.txt file (yet).

!"Stem Vowel before Reflexive s"
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ Y8: ;
!			where Vx in (i u)
!			      Vy in (á a)
!			matched ;
! This rule is not implemented, there is no Y8 in the sme-lex.txt file (yet).

"Indicative Present Singular 3rd Final Vowel"      ! jearraQ1:jearrá
  Vx:á <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q1: ;                             ! boahtiQ1:boahtá
			where Vx in (a i) ;
!!€ jearraQ1
!!€ jearrá0

!!€ boahºtiQ1
!!€ boah0tá0


"Imperative Present 1st/3rd Person and Connegative Final Vowel"
  Vx:o <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q3: ;                             ! jearraQ3n:jerron
			where Vx in (a i u) ;                  ! boahtiQ3n:bohton
                                                   ! čuorvuQ3n:čurvon
!!€ jearraQ3n
!!€ je0rro0n

!!€ jearraQ2t
!!€ je0rre0t

!!€ boahºtiQ3n
!!€ bo0h0to0n

!!€ čuorºvuQ3n
!!€ ču0r0vo0n


"Stem Vowel Shift a:e, i:e, u:o"                   ! jearra:jerre
  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Q2: ;                            ! boahtit:bohtet
			where Vx in (a i u)                    ! čuorvu:čurvo
			      Vy in (e e o)
			matched ;
! This is for Prs Du1, Pl3, and 2nd Person Imperative
!!€ jearraQ2
!!€ je0rre0

!!€ boahºtiQ2t
!!€ bo0h0te0t

!!€ čuorºvuQ2
!!€ ču0r0vo0


"Stem Vowel shift i:á"
  i:á <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ Q4: | Q5: ] ; !1st and 2nd Person Singular Present/before Conditional Marker
         Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) W5: ; !Dim-freq verbs
         Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) W6: ; !Sub-freq verbs
!!€ boahºtiQ4n
!!€ boa00đá0n

!!€ boahºtiQ5lin
!!€ boa00đá0lin

"Stem Vowel shift u:o"
 u:o <=> Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) [ W5: | W7: ] ; !Dim-freq verbs, geaffut:geafostallat + stuvvat.

"Stem Vowel shift i:e"
 i:e <=> Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) W7: ; !!Dim-freq verbs, geaffut:geafostallat + stuvvat.
         Cns:+ _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) W8: ; ! Deverbal nouns -meahttun



!"Stem Vowel before Conditional Marker"              ! boahtit:boađálin
!   i:á <=> Cns _ Q5: ;         !Collapsed into one rule, see above
!  Vx:Vy <=> Cns _ Q5: ;                            ! The u:o alternation
!			where Vx in (u i)           ! removed because it gave
!			      Vy in (o á)           ! *čuorvvolin, but Nickel
!			matched ;                   ! gives čuorvvulin.


"Stem Vowel in Dual 2nd Person Imperative"          ! jearra:jearri
  a:i <=> Cns _ ( %>: ) ( »: ( »: »: )) Y1: ;
!!€ jearraY1
!!€ jearri0

!ska vara: viehkat->viehkki
!status: viehkat->viehkkimuorra/viehkkamuorra

!ska vara: viehkka¤ -> viehkki
!status: viehºka¤ -> viehkkimuorra/viehkkamuorra

! viehºka¤>∑#
